District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

7-862

Rules.

Repealed. .

Apr. 9 1997, D.C. Law 11-172, § 3, 43 DCR 4491
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 33, 53 DCR 6794
1981 Ed., § 6-332.
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 3 of Early Intervention Services Sliding Fee Scale Establishment Temporary Act of 1994 (D.C. Law 10-199, March 14, 1995, law notification 42 DCR 1516).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 3 of Early Intervention Services Sliding Fee Scale Establishment Temporary Act of 1996 (D.C. Law 11-132, May 29, 1996, law notification 43 DCR 3360).
For temporary addition of subchapter, see note to § 7-861.
For temporary (90 day) addition of subchapter, see §§ 502 to 504 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-310, March 26, 2002, 49 DCR 3420).